test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VII_VV_IND_mchaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - VV - mchaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     mod     per
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 256)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: mchaa
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+4Sg: mchaani

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg: mchaaba
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+4Sg: mchaanwiba #cons
     #mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+4Sg: mchaanba #book (w-del, very impoverished UR)
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg: mchaadig
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+4Sg: mchaanwidig 
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0Sg: mchaagba
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+4Sg: mchaangoba 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl: mchaabniin
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+4Pl: mchaanwibniin #cons
     #mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+4Pl: mchaanwabniin #book (unexplained quality shift)
     #mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+4Pl: mchaanbniin #book (overdeletion in book, very impoverished UR)
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl: mchaadgenan
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+4Pl: mchaanwidgenan 
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0Pl: mchaagbaniin
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+4Pl: mchaangobniin 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl: mchaawan
     #mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl: mchaanoon #book variant (odd hiatus resolution)
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+4Pl: mchaanwan

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg: mchaasnoo #d deletes in negative!
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+4Sg: mchaasnooni 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg: mchaasnooba
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+4Sg: mchaasnoonwiba
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg: mchaasnoodig
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+4Sg: mchaasnoonwidig
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0Sg: mchaasnoogba 
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+4Sg: mchaasnoongoba 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl: mchaasnoobniin
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+4Pl: mchaasnoonwibniin
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl: mchaasnoodgenan
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+4Pl: mchaasnoonwidgenan
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0Pl: mchaasnoogbaniin 
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+4Pl: mchaasnoongobniin 

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl: mchaasnoon
     mchaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+4Pl: mchaasninwan #no variation listed in book
